Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-1302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Health Carrier External
Review Act is to provide uniform standards for the establishment and maintenance
of external review procedures to assure that covered persons have the opportunity
for an independent review of an adverse determination or final adverse determination.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 2.
September 6, 2013